Indiana, session 2026, HB1183.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-31.5-2-94.5, IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 94.5. "Digital sexual image", for
purposes of IC 35-45-4-9, has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-45-4-9.
SECTION 2. IC 35-31.5-2-100, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 204, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 100. (a) "Distribute", for purposes
of IC 35-45-4-8 and IC 35-45-4-9, has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-45-4-8.
(b) "Distribute", for purposes of IC 35-46-1-10, has the meaning set
forth in IC 35-46-1-10(f).
(c) "Distribute", for purposes of IC 35-46-1-10.2, has the meaning
set forth in IC 35-46-1-10.2(g).
(d) "Distribute", for purposes of IC 35-47.5, has the meaning set
forth in IC 35-47.5-2-6.
(e) "Distribute", for purposes of IC 35-48, has the meaning set forth
2026 IN 1183—LS 6804/DI 149


in IC 35-48-1.1-13.
(f) "Distribute", for purposes of IC 35-49, has the meaning set forth
in IC 35-49-1-2.
SECTION 3. IC 35-45-4-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.79-2024,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) This section does not apply to:
(1) a photograph, digital image, or video that is distributed:
(A) to report a possible criminal act;
(B) in connection with a criminal investigation;
(C) under a court order;
(D) to a location that is:
(i) intended solely for the storage or backup of personal data,
including photographs, digital images, and video; and
(ii) password protected; or
(E) by a news reporting or an entertainment medium (as
defined in IC 32-36-1-4);
(2) a newspaper or news service that publishes news related
information through a website;
(3) a cloud service provider; or
(4) an Internet provider, an affiliate or subsidiary of an Internet
provider, or a search engine that:
(A) solely provides access or connection to a website or other
Internet content that is not under the control of that Internet
service provider, affiliate or subsidiary, or search engine; and
(B) is not responsible for creating or publishing the content
that constitutes material harmful to minors.
(b) As used in this section, "distribute" means to transfer to another
person in, or by means of, any medium, forum, telecommunications
device or network, or website, including posting an image on a website
or application.
(c) As used in this section, "intimate image" means a photograph,
digital image, computer generated image, or video:
(1) that depicts:
(A) sexual intercourse;
(B) other sexual conduct (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-221.5);
or
(C) exhibition of the uncovered buttocks, genitals, or female
breast;
of an individual;
(2) taken, captured, created, disseminated, or recorded by:
(A) an individual depicted in the photograph, digital image, or
video and given or transmitted directly to the person described
2026 IN 1183—LS 6804/DI 149


in subsection (d);
(B) the person described in subsection (d) in the physical
presence of an individual depicted in the photograph, digital
image, or video; or
(C) the person described in subsection (d) with respect to a
photograph, digital image, computer generated image, or video
of an individual created or modified by means of a computer
software program, artificial intelligence, application, or other
digital editing tools; and
(3) that is of a quality, characteristic, or condition such that it
appears to depict the alleged victim.
(d) A person who:
(1) knows or reasonably should know that an individual depicted
in an intimate image does not consent to the distribution of the
intimate image; and
(2) distributes the intimate image;
commits distribution of an intimate image, a Class A misdemeanor
Level 6 felony. However, the offense is a Level 6 5 felony if the person
has a prior unrelated conviction under this section.
(e) It is not a necessary element of the offense described in
subsection (d) that the individual depicted in the intimate image
actually sent the image.
SECTION 4. IC 35-45-4-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) This section does not apply to:
(1) a digital image or video that is distributed:
(A) to report a possible criminal act;
(B) in connection with a criminal investigation;
(C) under a court order; or
(D) by a news reporting or an entertainment medium (as
defined in IC 32-36-1-4);
(2) a newspaper or news service that publishes news related
information through a website;
(3) a cloud service provider; or
(4) an Internet provider, an affiliate or subsidiary of an
Internet provider, or a search engine that:
(A) solely provides access or connection to a website or
other Internet content that is not under the control of that
Internet service provider, affiliate or subsidiary, or search
engine; and
(B) is not responsible for creating or publishing the content
that constitutes material harmful to minors.
2026 IN 1183—LS 6804/DI 149


(b) As used in this section, "digital sexual image" means a
digital, computer generated image or video that is created or
modified by means of artificial intelligence, a computer software
program, an application, or other editing tools that depicts:
(1) sexual intercourse;
(2) other sexual conduct (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-221.5); or
(3) exhibition of the uncovered buttocks, genitals, or female
breast;
of a quality, characteristic, or condition such that it appears to
depict an individual.
(c) As used in this section, "distribute" has the meaning set forth
in section 8(b) of this chapter.
(d) A person who:
(1) creates; or
(2) possesses;
a digital sexual image without the consent of the individual
depicted in the digital sexual image commits digital sexual image
abuse, a Class A misdemeanor. However, the offense is a Level 6
felony if the person has a prior unrelated conviction under this
subsection.
(e) A person who distributes a digital sexual image without the
consent of the individual depicted in the digital sexual image
commits distribution of a digital sexual image, a Level 6 felony.
However, the offense is a Level 5 felony if the person has a prior
unrelated conviction under this subsection.
2026 IN 1183—LS 6804/DI 149